Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.310

Immigration enforcement model policies—Adoption by schools, health facilities, courthouses.

(1) The attorney general, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, must publish model policies within twelve months after May 21, 2019, for limiting immigration enforcement to the fullest extent possible consistent with federal and state law at public schools, health facilities operated by the state or a political subdivision of the state, courthouses, and shelters, to ensure they remain safe and accessible to all Washington residents, regardless of immigration or citizenship status.

(2) All public schools, health facilities either operated by the state or a political subdivision of the state, and courthouses must:

(a) Adopt necessary changes to policies consistent with the model policy; or

(b) Notify the attorney general that the agency is not adopting the changes to its policies consistent with the model policy, state the reasons that the agency is not adopting the changes, and provide the attorney general with a copy of the agency's policies.

(3) All other organizations and entities that provide services related to physical or mental health and wellness, education, or access to justice, are encouraged to adopt the model policy.

(4) Implementation of any policy under this section must be in accordance with state and federal law; policies, grants, waivers, or other requirements necessary to maintain funding; or other agreements related to the operation and functions of the organization, including databases within the organization.

(5) The definitions in RCW 43.17.420 apply to this section.

[ 2019 c 440 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2019 c 440: See notes following RCW 43.17.425.